Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2203.01
Accredited degree-awarding community college, college, or university, defined.

Accredited degree-awarding community college, college, or university means an institution that is approved or accredited by an accreditation association or agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education.

Laws 2014, LB717, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 17.